DI-124
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DI3R4-01

DTC P07 10/38[Transmission Fluid Temperature Sensor
Malfunction (ATF Temperature Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The ATF temperature sensor converts fluid temperature into a resistance value which is input into the Engine
andECTECU (2UZ -FE,1FZ -FE)orECTECU (1HZ,1HD -T,1HD -FTE).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Either (a) or (b) is detected for 0.5 sec. or more.
(2-tripdetectionlogic)

P0710/38 (a) Temperature sensorresistanceislessthan 79 Q
(b) After the engine has been operating for 15 minutes or
more, the resistance atthe temp. sensoris more than 156 k

¢ Openorshortin ATF temperature sensor

* ATFtemperature sensor

*EngineandECTECU (2UZ -FE,1FZ -FE)
é ECTECU (1HZ,1HD -T,1HD -FTE)
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check ATF temperature sensor.

PREPARATION:
Remove the ATF temperature sensor (See page AT-8).
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 5 of solenoid con-
nector at 10 °C (50 °F) and 110 °C (230 °F).
OK:
Resistance (Approx.):
10 °C (50 °F): 6.5 kQ
D03252 110 °C (230 °F): 200 - 300 Q

NG> Replace the ATF temperature sensor.

@

2 | Check harness and connector between ATF temperature sensor and Engine and
ECT ECU or ECT ECU (See page IN-35).

@

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
or ECT ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace the harness or connector.
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